New York, session 2025-2026, A7342.
do enact as follows:
Section 1. The agriculture and markets law is amended by adding a new
section 387 to read as follows:
§ 387. New York state equine industry board. 1. There shall be estab-
lished within the department the New York state equine industry board,
to advise and make recommendations to the state agencies on state
government plans, policies and programs affecting all aspects of equine
industry, as outlined below, and in such areas as its experience and
studies may indicate to be appropriate. The department shall provide
necessary secretarial and support services to the board.
2. The equine industry board shall consist of seventeen members
appointed by the governor, selected for their experience and expertise
related to areas of board responsibility. Members shall include the
commissioner or their designee who shall act as chairperson of the
board, and representatives of the following stakeholder groups: Cornell
university college of agriculture and life sciences; Cornell university
college of veterinary medicine; a rescue organization or the humane
society; an organization involved in horse sanctuaries or racehorse
aftercare; an organization involved in horse therapy; an equine veteri-
narian; a trail or recreational riding group; the equine support indus-
try; an organizer of horse shows, rodeos or competitions; horse boarders
or riding stables; an urban equestrian organization; the horse breeding
EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets
[ ] is old law to be omitted.
LBD11101-06-5

A. 7342--B 2
industry; farmers and ranchers; an academic researcher; the New York
state horse council or a similar organization; the New York state Veter-
inary Medical Society or a similar organization; and a youth equine
organization. Members shall be appointed for a term of three years and
may serve until their successors are chosen provided, however, that of
the members first appointed, five of the members shall serve for a term
of one year, five shall serve for a term of two years, and seven shall
serve for a term of three years. Members shall serve without salary but
shall be entitled to reimbursement of their ordinary and necessary trav-
el expenses.
3. (a) The duties and responsibilities of the equine advisory board
shall include, but not be limited to, providing timely advice, comments
and recommendations to the commissioner regarding:
(i) equine-tourism;
(ii) equine industry promotion;
(iii) workforce development;
(iv) educational and training initiatives;
(v) humane treatment of horses; and
(vi) other areas of interest identified by the board.
(b) The commissioner may delegate to the board such additional duties
and responsibilities as are deemed necessary.
4. The duties and responsibilities of the equine industry board shall
include, but not be limited to, providing timely advice, comments and
recommendations to the commissioner and other state agency heads regard-
ing all aspects of the equine industry in the state. Concerned state
agencies shall be encouraged to establish a working relationship with
the board and shall fully cooperate with the board in any requests it
shall make.
5. The equine industry board may ask other individuals to attend its
meetings or work with it on an occasional or regular basis. The board
shall set the time and place of its meetings and shall hold at least one
meeting per year. The board may establish committees and regional work-
ing groups as necessary.
6. The equine industry board shall produce an annual report to the
governor and the legislature on or before the end of each calendar year
concerning its activities during the previous year and its program
expectations for the succeeding year.
7. (a) The equine industry board shall advise the commissioner in
establishing procedures for making annual awards and grants, within the
limits of appropriations made therefor, recognizing New York equine
businesses, individuals, and institutions that are successful in inno-
vating, marketing, and/or promoting New York equine industries. The
commissioner shall coordinate with the commissioner of economic develop-
ment to determine which department shall make awards and grants in vari-
ous categories identified by the equine industry board. These awards and
grants shall be given in recognition of exceptional performance, inno-
vation and support for New York equine industries by persons, firms and
organizations that are principally located within the state of New York
and engaged in the operation of New York equine farms, businesses and
institutions.
(b) The board may annually nominate and forward such nominations for
awards and grants to the commissioner consideration in the following
categories:
(i) veterinary practice and horse welfare;
(ii) equine-tourism;
(iii) workforce development;

A. 7342--B 3
(iv) public education;
(v) youth equine activities; and
(vi) such other awards and grants as the equine advisory board shall
recommend.
(c) The commissioner shall have the discretion to designate award and
grant winners from these nominees. Current members of the board and
their businesses are not eligible as nominees.
§ 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall
have become a law.